nb: Hydroponisk næringssystem: Flerdelt; Endelt; Tredelt; Todelt; Annet
da: Hydroponisk næringssystem: Flere dele; Én del; Tre dele; To dele; Andet
ko: 수경 재배 영양제 시스템: 멀티 파트; 원 파트; 쓰리 파트; 투 파트; 기타
pl: System odżywiania hydroponicznego: Wieloskładnikowy; Jednoskładnikowy; Trójskładnikowy; Dwuskładnikowy; Pozostałe
ru: Система гидропонных удобрений: Многокомпонентный; Однокомпонентный; Трехкомпонентный; Двухкомпонентный; Другое
tr: Hidroponik besin sistemi: Çok parçalı; Tek parçalı; Üç parçalı; İki parçalı; Diğer
bg-BG: Хидропонна хранителна система: Многокомпонентно; Еднокомпонентно; Трикомпонентно; Двукомпонентно; Друго
ja: 水耕栽培栄養補給システム: 複数部構成; 1部構成; 3部構成; 2部構成; その他
el: Σύστημα υδροπονικών θρεπτικών συστατικών: Πολυμερές; Μονομερές; Τριμερές; Δύο μέρη; Άλλο
hu: Hidroponikus tápanyagrendszer: Többrészes; Egyrészes; Háromrészes; Kétrészes; Egyéb
hr-HR: Hidroponski sustav hranjivih tvari: Višedijelni; Jednodijelni; Trodijelni; Dvodijelni; Ostalo
en: Hydroponic nutrient system: Multi-part; One-part; Three-part; Two-part; Other
nl: Hydrofonisch voedingssysteem: Meerdelig; Een deel; Driedelig; Tweedelig; Overig
pt-PT: Sistema de nutrientes hidropónicos: Multipartes; Uma parte; Três partes; Duas partes; Outro
zh-CN: 水培营养系统: 多部分; 单部分; 三部分; 两部分; 其他
it: Sistema di nutrienti idroponici: Multiparte; Una parte; Tre parti; Due parti; Altro
es: Sistema de nutrientes hidropónicos: Varias partes; Una sola pieza; Tres piezas; Dos piezas; Otros
ro-RO: Sistem de nutrienți hidroponici: Mai multe părți; O singură parte; Trei părți; Două părți; Altele
fr: Système de nutriments hydroponiques: Multi-parties; Une partie; Trois parties; Deux parties; Autre
zh-TW: 水耕營養液系統: 多部分; 單部分; 三部分; 兩部分; 其他
sv: Hydroponiskt näringssystem: Flerdelad; Endelad; Tredelad; Tvådelad; Övrigt
vi: Hệ thống dinh dưỡng thủy canh: Nhiều phần; Một phần; Ba phần; Hai phần; Khác
lt-LT: Hidroponinės maistinių medžiagų sistemos tipas: Kelių dalių; Vienos dalies; Trijų dalių; Dviejų dalių; Kita
sk-SK: Hydroponický živný systém: Viacdielny; Jednodielny; Trojdielny; Dvojdielny; Iné
sl-SI: Hidroponični sistem gojenja: Večdelno; Enodelni; Tridelni; Dvodelno; Druga
cs: Systém výživy pro hydroponii: Vícesložkový; Jednosložkový; Třísložkový; Dvousložkový; Jiné
pt-BR: Sistema de nutrientes hidropônicos: Multipeças; Uma peça; Três peças; Duas peças; Outro
th: ระบบธาตุอาหารไฮโดรโปนิกส์: ระบบหลายส่วน; ระบบหนึ่งส่วน; ระบบสามส่วน; ระบบสองส่วน; อื่นๆ
de: Hydroponisches Nährstoffsystem: Mehrteilig; Einteilig; Dreiteilig; Zweiteilig; Sonstiges
fi: Hydroponinen ravinnejärjestelmä: Moniosainen; Yksiosainen; Kolmiosainen; Kaksiosainen; Muu